Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3754
Commission; prohibited acts.

The commission shall not:

(1) Engage in marketing of dry beans or any activity which would result in the formation of a marketing order;

(2) Be a party to a procedure which includes price setting or production quotas; and

(3) Purchase, construct, or otherwise obtain title to its own administrative office but shall be limited to leasing state or commercial office space.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 20.